Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
CHAPTER 281A Commercial Driver’s Licenses

281A.010.
Definitions for chapter.

“Alcohol” means:

Beer, ale, port, or stout and other similar fermented beverages, including sake or similar products, of any name or description containing one-half of one percentum (0.5%) or more of alcohol by volume, brewed or produced from malt, wholly or in part, or from any substitute therefor;

Wine of not less than one-half of one percentum (0.5%) of alcohol by volume;

Distilled spirits, which means that substance known as ethyl alcohol, ethanol, or spirits of wine in any form, including all dilutions and mixtures thereof from whatever source or by whatever process produced; or

Any substance containing ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl, spirit of wine, or any distilled spirits including but not limited to ethanol, methanol, propanol, and isopropanol.

“Alcohol concentration” means:

The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred (100) milliliters of blood;

The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten (210) liters of breath; or

The number of grams of alcohol per sixty-seven (67) milliliters of urine.

“Cabinet” means the Transportation Cabinet of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

“Commerce” means:

Any trade, traffic, or transportation within the jurisdiction of the United States between a place in a state and a place outside of the state, including a place outside of the United States; and

Trade, traffic, and transportation in the United States that affects any trade, traffic, and transportation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

“Commercial driver’s license,” or “CDL,” means a license issued to an individual in accordance with the requirements of this chapter or, if the license is issued by another state in accordance with the Federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act, to an individual that authorizes the individual to drive any class of commercial motor vehicle.

“Commercial driver’s license information system” or CDLIS means the national information system established to serve as a clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers.

“Commercial driver’s instruction permit” means a permit issued pursuant to KRS

281A.120

.

“Commercial motor vehicle,” or “CMV,” means a motor vehicle or combination motor vehicle used in commerce that is:

Designed to carry property and has a gross vehicle weight rating as determined by federal regulation which has been adopted into cabinet administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;

Designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver;

Transporting hazardous materials and is required to be placarded in accordance with Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 172; or

Any other vehicle that is required by cabinet administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, to be operated by a licensed commercial driver.

“Controlled substance” means any substance so classified under Section 102(6) of the Controlled Substances Act, 21

U.S.C. sec. 802(6)

, and includes all substances listed on Schedules I through V, of Title 21, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 1308, as adopted by the Transportation Cabinet by administrative regulation pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. It shall also include those substances defined or listed in KRS Chapter 218A.

“Conviction” means an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or a determination that a person has violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or an authorized administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person’s appearance in court, a plea of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere, or Alford plea entered and accepted by the court, the payment of a fine or court cost, or violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended, or probated.

“Disqualification” means any of the following actions:

The suspension, revocation, or cancellation of a CDL by the Commonwealth or the jurisdiction of issuance;

Any withdrawal of a person’s privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle by the Commonwealth or another jurisdiction as a result of a violation of state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking, vehicle weight, or vehicle defect violations; or

A determination by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration that a person is not qualified to operate a commercial motor vehicle under 49 C.F.R. pt. 391.

“Drive” means to drive, operate, or be in physical control of a motor vehicle.

“Driver” means any person who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle, or who is required to hold a commercial driver’s license.

“Driver’s license” means a license issued by a state to an individual that authorizes the individual to drive a motor vehicle.

“Employee” means any operator of a commercial motor vehicle, including full-time, regularly employed drivers; casual, intermittent, or occasional drivers; leased drivers and independent, owner-operator contractors while in the course of operating a commercial motor vehicle who are either directly employed by, under lease to, or operating in a manner indicating employment to an employer.

“Employer” means any person, including the United States, a state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a commercial motor vehicle, or assigns a person to drive a commercial motor vehicle.

“Felony” means any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year.

“Gross combination weight rating,” or “GCWR,” is the gross vehicle weight rating of power unit plus the gross vehicle weight rating of any towed unit. In the absence of a value specified by the manufacturer, GCWR shall be determined by adding the gross vehicle weight rating of the power unit and the total weight of the towed unit and load therein.

“Gross vehicle weight rating,” or “GVWR,” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single, a combination or an articulated vehicle.

“Hazardous materials” has the same meaning as in 49 C.F.R. sec. 383.5.

“Highway” shall include any way or place of any nature when any part of it is open to the use of the public as a matter of right, license, or privilege for the use of vehicular traffic.

“Imminent hazard” means a condition that presents a substantial likelihood that death, serious illness, severe personal injury, or a danger to health, property, or the environment exists.

“Moped” shall have the same meaning as in KRS 186.010(5).

“Motor vehicle” means a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power used on highways, or any other vehicle required to be registered under the laws of this state, but shall not include any vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or semitrailers operated exclusively on a rail.

“NDR” means the national driver register.

“Out-of-service order” means a declaration by an authorized enforcement officer of a federal, state, Canadian, Mexican, or local jurisdiction that a driver, commercial motor vehicle, or a motor carrier operation is out of service pursuant to 49 C.F.R. sec. 386.72, 392.5, 395.13, or 396.9; comparable laws or regulations; or the North American Uniform Out-of-Service Criteria.

“Resident” means a person who has established Kentucky as his or her state of domicile. Proof of residency shall include but not be limited to a deed or property tax bill, utility agreement or utility bill, or rental housing agreement.

“School bus” means a vehicle that meets the specification of KRS

156.153

used to transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students between school and home, or to and from school-sponsored events. A school bus shall not include a bus used as a common carrier.

“Serious traffic violation” means a conviction when operating a commercial motor vehicle of:

Excessive speeding, involving a single charge of any speed fifteen (15) miles per hour or more, above the specified speed limit;

Reckless driving, as defined under state or local law, including conviction of driving a commercial motor vehicle in willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property;

Improper or erratic traffic lane changes;

Following the vehicle ahead too closely;

A violation of any state or local law related to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with a fatal accident;

Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a CDL;

Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a CDL in one’s possession or refusing to display a CDL upon request;

Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of CDL or endorsements, or both, for the specific vehicle type or types being operated or for the passengers or type or types of cargo being transported; or

Any conviction of an offense that requires mandatory suspension under KRS

186.560

or a serious violation as defined by Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations Part 383 or as amended by the Federal Highway Administration.

“State” means a state of the United States and the District of Columbia.

“State police” means the Department of Kentucky State Police.

“Vehicle” means every device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn along a public highway, except devices moved by human or animal power, used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or which derives its power from overhead wires.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 4, effective January 1, 1991; 1992, ch. 274, § 1, effective April 7, 1992; 2002, ch. 204, § 1, effective April 5, 2002; 2005, ch. 165, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 28, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 85, § 285, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 21, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

281A.020.
Purpose — Construction.

It is the purpose of this chapter to implement the Federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 (Title XII of Public Law 99-570) and reduce or prevent commercial vehicle accidents, fatalities and injuries by:

Permitting commercial drivers to hold only one (1) license;

Disqualifying commercial drivers who have committed certain serious traffic violations, or other specified offenses as herein defined; and

Strengthening commercial driver licensing and testing standards.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to promote the public health, safety and welfare. As applied to commercial drivers, to the extent this chapter conflicts with general driver licensing provisions this chapter prevails. If this chapter is silent, general driver licensing provisions shall apply.

The issuance of a Class D, E, or M license as set forth in KRS

281A.170

shall be in accordance with the general driver licensing statutes in KRS Chapter 186 and shall be subject to the fees as set forth in KRS

186.531

in addition to any other fee required by statute.

Any administrative action taken pursuant to this chapter against a Class A, B, or C license shall be in addition to any administrative action taken against a Class D, E, or M license imposed under any other applicable statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

281A.030.
On-line automated computer record keeping system.

The Transportation Cabinet shall, as expeditiously as practicable, develop and maintain an on-line automated computer record keeping system having as a minimum, the capabilities and functions described or needed as set forth in this chapter. The cabinet shall be responsible for acquisition and installation of such equipment or services as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The Transportation Cabinet shall have the full responsibility and authority for the day-to-day administration of the automated system. All state government agencies, political subdivisions, and other agencies, including circuit clerks or third-party testing agencies affected by this system, shall cooperate with the Transportation Cabinet in the use and implementation of the automated system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

281A.040.
Regulations.

The Transportation Cabinet shall have all necessary power and authority to promulgate regulations and institute those programs that are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Any other state agency vested with a specific responsibility shall have the necessary power and authority to promulgate regulations to reasonably carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

281A.050.
Drivers excluded from operation of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:

Drivers of firefighting and other emergency equipment;

Drivers of commercial motor vehicles if those persons are:

Military personnel; and

Operating the vehicles in pursuit of a military purpose;

Drivers of farm vehicles that are:

Used to transport agricultural products, farm machinery, or farm supplies to or from a farm;

Not used in the operations of a common or contract motor carrier;

Used within one hundred fifty (150) highway miles of the farmer’s farm; and

Controlled and operated by a farmer, including operation by employees or family members; and

Drivers of vehicles that:

Are designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use; and

Operate on their own motor power or are mounted on or drawn by another vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 5, effective July 1, 1991; 1992, ch. 274, § 2, effective April 7, 1992; 2007, ch. 28, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

281A.060.
License limitation.

No person who drives a commercial motor vehicle may have more than one (1) driver’s license.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 6, effective July 13, 1990.

281A.070.
Information required from persons holding commercial driver’s license or applying to be a commercial driver.

Any driver who holds a commercial driver’s license or who is required to hold a commercial driver’s license shall within thirty (30) days in the manner specified by the cabinet:

Notify the cabinet of any conviction of a state law or local ordinance, relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, committed in another state or jurisdiction; and

Notify his employer in writing of any conviction of a state law or local ordinance, relating to motor vehicle traffic control other than a parking violation, committed in any state or jurisdiction.

Any driver whose commercial driver’s license is suspended, revoked, or canceled by any state, or who loses the privilege to drive a motor vehicle in any state for any period, including being disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle, or a driver who is subject to an out of service order, shall notify his employer of that fact before the end of the business day following the day the driver received notice of that fact.

Any person who applies to be a commercial motor vehicle driver shall provide the employer, at the time of the application, with the following information for the ten (10) years preceding the date of application whenever the information is available:

A list of the names and addresses of the applicant’s previous employers for which the applicant was a driver of a commercial motor vehicle;

The dates during which the applicant drove for each employer;

The reason for leaving that employer; and

A certification that all information furnished is true and complete.

An employer may require an applicant to provide information additional to that required by subsection (3) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 7, effective July 1, 1991.

281A.080.
Information required from applicant — Driver not permitted to drive, when — Employer restriction on operation of commercial vehicles.

Each employer shall require the applicant to provide the information specified in KRS

281A.070

. He shall inform the applicant that the information provided may be used or the applicant’s previous employers may be contacted for the purpose of investigating the applicant’s work history.

No employer shall knowingly allow, permit, or authorize a driver to drive a commercial vehicle during any period in which the driver:

Has had his commercial driver’s license suspended, revoked, or canceled by any state;

Is currently disqualified from driving a commercial vehicle;

Is subject to an out-of-service order in any state;

Has more than one (1) driver’s license;

Does not currently hold a valid commercial driver’s license; or

Is in violation of any of the railroad crossing offenses or conduct set forth in KRS

189.500

,

189.560

, or

189.565

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 8, effective July 1, 1991; 2007, ch. 28, § 3, effective June 26, 2007.

281A.090.
Restrictions on driving.

Except when driving under a commercial driver’s instruction permit and accompanied by the holder of commercial driver’s license valid for the vehicle being driven, no person shall drive a commercial motor vehicle on the highways of this state unless the person holds a valid commercial driver’s license with applicable endorsements valid for the vehicle he or she is driving.

No person shall drive a commercial motor vehicle on the highways of this state while his or her driving privilege for a commercial or noncommercial motor vehicle is suspended, revoked, or canceled, or while he or she is subject to a disqualification, or in violation of an out-of-service order.

The licensee shall have in his or her immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle his or her commercial driver’s license, and shall display the license upon demand to the Transportation Cabinet, a license examiner, a peace officer, a State Police officer, or an inspector or officer of the Department of Vehicle Regulation. It shall be a defense to a violator of this subsection if the person so charged produces in court a commercial driver’s license, issued to him or her before his or her arrest or violation and which was valid at that time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 9, effective July 1, 1991; 2007, ch. 85, § 286, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 75, § 20, effective June 25, 2009; 2020 ch. 51, § 28, effective March 27, 2020.

281A.0901.
Requirement for cabinet to extend state deadlines by administrative regulations if federal deadlines are extended.

If the United States Department of Transportation extends the date by which all commercial drivers are required to have a commercial driver’s license, the Transportation Cabinet shall by administrative regulation extend the effective date of KRS

281A.090

to match the extended federal date.

If the United States Department of Transportation extends the date for allowing the skills portion of the commercial driver’s license test to be waived, the Transportation Cabinet shall by administrative regulation extend the effective date of the waiver to match the extended federal date.

If the United States Department of Transportation extends the date for allowing a state to issue an intrastate medical waiver, the Transportation Cabinet shall by administrative regulation continue to accept applications for medical waivers and, as appropriate, issue intrastate medical waivers until the extended federal date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 274, § 11, effective April 7, 1992.

281A.100.
Release of information regarding commercial driving history record.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Transportation Cabinet shall upon request furnish full information regarding the commercial driving history record of any person to the following:

The driver licensing administrator, court official, or police agency of this or any other state or foreign jurisdiction, requesting that information;

Any employer or prospective employer;

The commercial driver; or

Any other person so established by administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, of the cabinet.

The cabinet may charge a fee of five dollars ($5) for this service.

The driving history record of a commercial driver shall include, but not be limited to, convictions for any moving traffic violation, traffic accident record, and all out-of-state moving traffic convictions.

If a person legally entitled to a commercial driving history releases information concerning the driving history record of a commercial driver, a state agency, employee, or agent shall not be held liable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 10, effective July 1, 1991; 1992, ch. 274, § 3, effective April 7, 1992.

281A.110.
Information regarding conviction of driver licensed by a foreign jurisdiction.

Within ten (10) days after receiving a report from a Kentucky court of a conviction of a commercial driver whose license has been issued by another jurisdiction for any violation of state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, committed in a commercial motor vehicle, the Transportation Cabinet shall notify the driver licensing authority in the other jurisdiction of the conviction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 11, effective July 13, 1990.

281A.120.
Issuance of commercial driver’s instruction permit.

A commercial driver’s instruction permit may be issued to an individual twenty-one (21) years and older who:

Has complied with the criminal history background check required by KRS

281A.300

;

Holds a valid Kentucky Class D operator’s license;

Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States; and

Has passed the vision and knowledge tests required for a commercial driver’s license of the class vehicle to be driven. Instruction permits shall be class specific.

A commercial driver’s instruction permit may be issued to a resident eighteen (18) years of age who:

Has complied with the criminal history background check required by KRS

281A.300

;

Holds a valid Kentucky Class D operator’s license;

Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States; and

Has passed the vision and knowledge tests required for a commercial driver’s license of the class vehicle to be driven.

A commercial driver’s license instruction permit issued under this subsection shall be valid only for the operation of a commercial motor vehicle in intrastate commerce that is not a school bus or a vehicle hauling hazardous material. The instruction permit shall be class specific and shall contain an “I” restriction noting that the commercial driver is limited to Kentucky intrastate commerce.

A commercial driver’s instruction permit shall not be issued to a resident for a period to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days. Only one (1) renewal or reissuance may be granted within a two (2) year period for the same class of vehicle. The holder of a commercial driver’s instruction permit may, unless otherwise disqualified, drive a commercial motor vehicle on the highways of Kentucky only when accompanied by the holder of a commercial driver’s license valid for the type of vehicle driven and who occupies a seat beside the permit holder for the purpose of giving instruction in driving the commercial motor vehicle.

A person who is not a resident who is enrolled in a program offering commercial truck driving under the Kentucky Community and Technical College System or a proprietary school licensed under KRS Chapter 165A may be issued a provisional Class D license that allows an applicant to include a commercial driver’s instruction permit into a single license that shall be valid for ninety (90) days. The fee for a provisional Class D license shall be the same as for a regular Class D license. A provisional Class D license may be renewed for one (1) ninety (90) day period. A person issued a provisional Class D license under this subsection shall be required to convert the license to a regular Kentucky CDL or return to the person’s state of domicile and transfer the Kentucky provisional Class D license to his or her state of domicile. A provisional Class D license issued under this subsection shall not be converted to a regular Class D license unless the applicant satisfies all Kentucky residency requirements. A commercial driver’s instruction permit shall contain, in addition to other information required by the cabinet, those requirements set forth in KRS

281A.170

. The commercial driver’s instruction permit shall not contain the permit holder’s Social Security number but shall include a color photo of the permit holder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 12, effective July 1, 1991; 1994, ch. 481, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 204, § 4, effective April 5, 2002; 2017 ch. 100, § 33, effective January 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes.

Section 37 of Acts 1990, ch. 455 provided that: “Sections 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 12, 13, 17, 18, 19, 21, 22, 23, 24, and 25 of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 1991, notwithstanding the Transportation Cabinet may delay implementation until the automated commercial records system is on-line and operational.”

For this section as effective until January 1, 2019, see the bound volume.

281A.130.
Requirements for issuance of license.

A person shall not be issued a commercial driver’s license unless that person:

Is a resident of this state;

Holds a valid operator’s license;

Has complied with the provisions of KRS

281A.300

;

Except as provided in KRS

281A.165

, has passed the knowledge and skills tests for driving a commercial motor vehicle which comply with minimum federal standards established by federal regulation enumerated in Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 383, as adopted by the cabinet; and

Has satisfied all other safety requirements including those requirements imposed by state law or federal regulation. The tests shall be prescribed and conducted as set forth in KRS

281A.160

.

A commercial driver’s license, or commercial driver’s instruction permit shall not be issued to a person while the person is subject to a disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle, or while the person’s driver’s license or driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or canceled in any state or jurisdiction.

A commercial driver’s license shall not be issued to a person who has a commercial driver’s license issued by any other state unless the person first surrenders all such licenses, which shall be returned to the issuing jurisdiction for cancellation.

To ensure that an applicant for a commercial driver’s license or instruction permit complies with the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Transportation Cabinet shall verify through the commercial driver’s license information system and national driver register that the person applying for a Kentucky CDL does not currently have his or her operator’s license or driving privilege suspended or revoked in another licensing jurisdiction. If the person’s operator’s license or driving privilege is currently suspended or revoked in another licensing jurisdiction, the Transportation Cabinet shall not issue the person a Kentucky CDL until the person resolves the matter in the other licensing jurisdiction and complies with the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 186.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 13, effective July 1, 1991; 2002, ch. 204, § 5, effective April 5, 2002; 2011, ch. 20, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2020 ch. 51, § 29, effective March 27, 2020.

281A.140.
Form of application — Change of address — Lost or destroyed license — Penalty.

The application for a commercial driver’s license or commercial driver’s instruction permit shall include the following information:

The full legal name, including nicknames, and present Kentucky resident address of the applicant. If the applicant’s mailing address is different from the resident address, the mailing address shall also be included. If the applicant is not a resident, the application shall include the person’s resident address in the person’s state of domicile and the address of the Kentucky driver training school where the applicant is currently enrolled;

A physical description of the applicant including sex, height, weight, eye color, and race;

The applicant’s date of birth;

The applicant’s Social Security number;

The applicant’s signature;

Certifications including those required by Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, secs. 383.71, 383.73, and 384.206, as adopted by the cabinet;

A consent to release driving record information;

A valid Class D operator’s license issued pursuant to KRS

186.4102

and

186.412

;

A birth certificate if the applicant does not hold a valid operator’s license at the time of application;

The name of every jurisdiction in which the applicant has previously been licensed to drive any type of motor vehicle during the ten (10) year period immediately preceding the date of the application; and

Any other information required by the cabinet.

The cabinet or state police may require any other information needed in order to process the application.

When the holder of a commercial driver’s license changes his or her name or residence, the information shall be reported to the cabinet within ten (10) days. The holder of a Class A, B, or C license shall make an application for a duplicate license within thirty (30) days of changing his name or address.

Any person whose commercial driver’s license has been legitimately lost or destroyed shall make an application for a duplicate:

A person applying for the first duplicate within the time period for which the original license was issued, shall apply to the Transportation Cabinet. The person shall provide the cabinet with proof of the person’s identity and a notarized affidavit with a raised seal explaining in detail the loss or destruction of the original license.

A person applying for a second or subsequent duplicate within the time period for which the original license was issued, shall apply to the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office. The person shall provide the cabinet with proof of the person’s identity and a notarized affidavit explaining in detail the loss or destruction of the previous duplicate issued. The Transportation Cabinet shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the application, review the person’s proof of identity and affidavit and determine if the person will be issued a duplicate.

A person who is a resident of this state shall not drive a commercial motor vehicle under the authority of a commercial driver’s license issued by another jurisdiction.

Any person who knowingly falsifies information or certifications required to obtain a commercial driver’s license, a commercial driver’s license permit, or a duplicate commercial driver’s license subsequent to an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS

186.570

, shall be subject to suspension, revocation, or cancellation of his commercial driver’s license for a period of at least sixty (60) consecutive days.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 14, effective January 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 318, § 209, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 204, § 6, effective April 5, 2002; 2005, ch. 165, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 100, § 31, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 30, effective March 27, 2020.

Compiler's Notes.

Section 36 of Acts 1990, ch. 455 provided that: “Sections 4, 14, 15, 16, and 20 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 1991.”

281A.150.
Applicants to apply in person — Fees — Acceptance of payment methods.

Every person seeking a commercial driver’s license or a commercial driver’s instruction permit shall first apply in person to the cabinet. The application shall be in the form prescribed by KRS

281A.140

as provided by the cabinet. Except as provided in KRS 281A.160(6), each time a person applies for a commercial driver’s license, an instruction permit, or seeks to upgrade or change his or her commercial driver’s license, the person shall be required to:

Update the application; and

Submit the appropriate fee to the cabinet.

In addition to the fees for an operator’s license under KRS

186.531

, the cabinet shall set fees by administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, for the following applications that shall not exceed:

Forty dollars ($40) for each application for a commercial driver’s license. The fee shall be based on the class, type of license, endorsement, restriction, or tests to be taken;

Thirty-five dollars ($35) for each application for a commercial driver’s instruction permit;

Fifteen dollars ($15) for each application for a change or addition in class or type of license, endorsement, or restriction; and

Forty dollars ($40) for each application for a duplicate if it is the first duplicate applied for within the time period for which the original license was issued. Sixty dollars ($60) for a second or subsequent duplicate applied for within the time period for which the original license was issued. The fees required for a duplicate shall be in addition to fees charged under subsection (2)(c) of this section.

In addition to the fees for an operator’s license KRS

186.531

, the cabinet shall set fees by administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, for the following commercial driver’s licenses that shall not exceed:

Forty-five dollars ($45) for each initial or renewal of a commercial driver’s license;

Sixty dollars ($60) for each transfer of a commercial driver’s license; and

Thirty dollars ($30) for each initial or renewal of a commercial driver’s license with an “S” endorsement.

All fees remitted to the cabinet shall be nonrefundable regardless of whether the applicant completes the requirements for a commercial driver’s license or is tested.

All fees collected for the issuance of a commercial driver’s license or a commercial driver’s instruction permit shall be deposited into trust and agency accounts to be used exclusively for the administration and implementation of this chapter, except as prescribed in subsection (6) of this section. The accounts shall not lapse but shall be continuing from year to year.

All fees collected pursuant to this section, shall be allocated between the Transportation Cabinet and Department of Kentucky State Police, except a fifty cent ($0.50) issuance fee shall be allocated to the general fund from issuance of a commercial driver’s license permit. A three dollar ($3) issuance fee shall be allocated to the general fund from issuance of a commercial driver’s license.

Any applicant who seeks reinstatement of his or her commercial driving privilege after a suspension, withdrawal, revocation, or disqualification shall pay a reinstatement fee of fifty dollars ($50) in addition to those fees required by subsection (2) of this section and shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

281A.160

. This fee shall not be required if his or her commercial driving privilege was withdrawn only as a result of the withdrawal of his or her privilege to drive a noncommercial motor vehicle.

Beginning July 1, 2020, as payment for any fee identified in this section, the cabinet:

Shall accept cash and personal checks; and

May accept other methods of payment in accordance with KRS

45.345

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 455, § 15, effective January 1, 1991; 1992, ch. 11, § 2, effective February 20, 1992; 1992, ch. 274, § 4, effective April 7, 1992; 2002, ch. 204, § 7, effective April 5, 2002; 2007, ch. 28, § 4, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 85, § 287, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 100, § 34, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 31, effective March 27, 2020.